Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-2802
Act, purpose.

The purpose of the Manufacturing Modernization and Workforce Development Pilot Investment Act is to:

(1) Provide one-time grants to eligible manufacturing operations for new and existing capital investments that will increase or lead to the adoption and integration of smart technologies and increased productivity; and

(2) Provide a positive economic impact in the State of Nebraska.

Laws 2025, LB265, § 2.